New York, session 2025-2026, S1871.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 404-z of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by chapter 208 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. A distinctive plate issued pursuant to this section shall be issued 5 in the same manner as other number plates upon payment of the regular 6 registration fee prescribed by section four hundred one of this arti- 7 cle[, provided, however, that an additional annual service charge of 8 twenty-five dollars shall be charged for such plate]. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05507-01-5